Illinois, session 104th, HB2350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera 5Act is amended by changing Section 10-10 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 706/10-10)7    Sec. 10-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Auxiliary officer" means an individual serving the police 9agency of a municipality pursuant to Section 3.1-30-20 of the 10Illinois Municipal Code or serving a county sheriff pursuant 11to Section 3-6013 of the Counties Code. 12    "Badge" means an officer's department issued 13identification number associated with his or her position as a 14police officer with that department.15    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 16Standards Board created by the Illinois Police Training Act.17    "Business offense" means a petty offense for which the 18fine is in excess of $1,000.19    "Community caretaking function" means a task undertaken by 20a law enforcement officer in which the officer is performing 21an articulable act unrelated to the investigation of a crime. 22"Community caretaking function" includes, but is not limited 23to, participating in town halls or other community outreach,   HB2350 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 05069 RTM 15097 b1helping a child find his or her parents, providing death 2notifications, and performing in-home or hospital well-being 3checks on the sick, elderly, or persons presumed missing. 4"Community caretaking function" excludes law 5enforcement-related encounters or activities. 6    "Fund" means the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund. 7    "In uniform" means a law enforcement officer who is 8wearing any officially authorized uniform designated by a law 9enforcement agency, or a law enforcement officer who is 10visibly wearing articles of clothing, a badge, tactical gear, 11gun belt, a patch, or other insignia that he or she is a law 12enforcement officer acting in the course of his or her duties. 13    "Law enforcement officer" or "officer" means any person 14employed by a State, county, municipality, special district, 15college, unit of government, or any other entity authorized by 16law to employ peace officers or exercise police authority and 17who is primarily responsible for the prevention or detection 18of crime and the enforcement of the laws of this State. "Law 19enforcement officer" or "officer" includes an auxiliary 20officer assigned to public service. 21    "Law enforcement agency" means all State agencies with law 22enforcement officers, county sheriff's offices, municipal, 23special district, college, or unit of local government police 24departments.25    "Law enforcement-related encounters or activities" 26include, but are not limited to, traffic stops, pedestrian   HB2350 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 05069 RTM 15097 b1stops, arrests, searches, interrogations, investigations, 2pursuits, crowd control, traffic control, non-community 3caretaking interactions with an individual while on patrol, or 4any other instance in which the officer is enforcing the laws 5of the municipality, county, or State. "Law 6enforcement-related encounter or activities" does not include 7when the officer is completing paperwork alone, is 8participating in training in a classroom setting, or is only 9in the presence of another law enforcement officer.10    "Minor traffic offense" means a petty offense, business 11offense, or Class C misdemeanor under the Illinois Vehicle 12Code or a similar provision of a municipal or local ordinance.13    "Officer-worn body camera" means an electronic camera 14system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, 15displaying, and processing audiovisual recordings that may be 16worn about the person of a law enforcement officer.17    "Peace officer" has the meaning provided in Section 2-13 18of the Criminal Code of 2012.19    "Petty offense" means any offense for which a sentence of 20imprisonment is not an authorized disposition.21    "Recording" means the process of capturing data or 22information stored on a recording medium as required under 23this Act. 24    "Recording medium" means any recording medium authorized 25by the Board for the retention and playback of recorded audio 26and video including, but not limited to, VHS, DVD, hard drive,   HB2350 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 05069 RTM 15097 b1cloud storage, solid state, digital, flash memory technology, 2or any other electronic medium.3(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22.) 4    Section 10. The Law Enforcement Camera Grant Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5 and 10 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 707/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Auxiliary officer" means an individual serving the police 9agency of a municipality pursuant to Section 3.1-30-20 of the 10Illinois Municipal Code or serving a county sheriff pursuant 11to Section 3-6013 of the Counties Code. 12    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 13Standards Board created by the Illinois Police Training Act.14    "In-car video camera" means a video camera located in a 15law enforcement patrol vehicle.16    "In-car video camera recording equipment" means a video 17camera recording system located in a law enforcement patrol 18vehicle consisting of a camera assembly, recording mechanism, 19and an in-car video recording medium. 20    "In uniform" means a law enforcement officer who is 21wearing any officially authorized uniform designated by a law 22enforcement agency, or a law enforcement officer who is 23visibly wearing articles of clothing, badge, tactical gear, 24gun belt, a patch, or other insignia indicating that he or she   HB2350 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 05069 RTM 15097 b1is a law enforcement officer acting in the course of his or her 2duties. 3    "Law enforcement officer" or "officer" means any person 4employed by a unit of local government or an Illinois public 5university as a policeman, peace officer or in some like 6position involving the enforcement of the law and protection 7of the public interest at the risk of that person's life.8    "Officer-worn body camera" means an electronic camera 9system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, 10displaying, and processing audiovisual recordings that may be 11worn about the person of a law enforcement officer.12    "Recording" means the process of capturing data or 13information stored on a recording medium as required under 14this Act.15    "Recording medium" means any recording medium authorized 16by the Board for the retention and playback of recorded audio 17and video including, but not limited to, VHS, DVD, hard drive, 18cloud storage, solid state, digital, flash memory technology, 19or any other electronic medium.20    "Unit of local government" has the meaning ascribed to it 21in Section 1 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 22(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.) 23    (50 ILCS 707/10)24    Sec. 10. Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund; creation, 25rules.   HB2350 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 05069 RTM 15097 b1    (a) The Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund is created as a 2special fund in the State treasury. From appropriations to the 3Board from the Fund, the Board must make grants to units of 4local government in Illinois and Illinois public universities 5for the purpose of (1) purchasing or leasing in-car video 6cameras for use in law enforcement vehicles, (2) purchasing or 7leasing officer-worn body cameras and associated technology 8for law enforcement officers and auxiliary officers, and (3) 9training for law enforcement officers and auxiliary officers 10in the operation of the cameras. Grants under this Section may 11be used to offset data storage and related licensing costs for 12officer-worn body cameras. For the purposes of this Section, 13"purchasing or leasing" includes providing funding to units of 14local government in advance that can be used to obtain this 15equipment rather than only for reimbursement of purchased 16equipment. 17    Moneys received for the purposes of this Section, 18including, without limitation, fee receipts and gifts, grants, 19and awards from any public or private entity, must be 20deposited into the Fund. Any interest earned on moneys in the 21Fund must be deposited into the Fund.22    (b) The Board may set requirements for the distribution of 23grant moneys and determine which law enforcement agencies are 24eligible.25    (b-5) The Board shall consider compliance with the Uniform 26Crime Reporting Act as a factor in awarding grant moneys.  HB2350 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 05069 RTM 15097 b1    (c) (Blank).2    (d) (Blank).3    (e) (Blank).4    (f) (Blank).5    (g) (Blank).6    (h) (Blank).7(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 8103-588, eff. 7-1-24.)